fi: Siemenen kokoluokitus: Kanan kieli (erittäin pieni); Suuri; Normaali; Pieni; Muu
ko: 종자 크기 분류: 치킨 텅(아주 작음); 대형; 일반; 소형; 기타
zh-CN: 种子大小分类: 鸡舌（极小）; 大; 正常; 小; 其他
ru: Классификация размера семян: Куриный язычок (очень мелкие); Крупные; Нормальные; Мелкие; Другое
el: Κατηγοριοποίηση μεγέθους σπόρου: Γλώσσα κοτόπουλου (πολύ μικρό); Μεγάλο; Κανονικό; Μικρό; Άλλο
nl: Classificatie van zaadgrootte: Kippentong (zeer klein); Groot; Normaal; Klein; Overig
de: Klassifizierung der Samengröße: Hühnerzunge (sehr klein); Groß; Normal; Klein; Andere
lt-LT: Sėklų dydžio klasifikacija: Vištos liežuvėlis (labai mažos); Didelės; Normalios; Mažos; Kita
bg-BG: Класификация на размера на семената: Пилешко езиче (много малък); Голям; Нормален; Малък; Друго
ro-RO: Clasificare a dimensiunii semințelor: Limbă de pui (foarte mică); Mare; Normală; Mică; Altele
tr: Tohum boyut sınıflandırması: Tavuk dili (çok küçük); Büyük; Normal; Küçük; Diğer
ja: シードサイズ分類: チキントング (極小); 大; 普通; 小; その他
sk-SK: Klasifikácia veľkosti semien: Slepačí jazýček (veľmi malé); Veľké; Normálne; Malé; Iné
hr-HR: Klasifikacija veličine sjemena: Pileći jezik (vrlo malo); Veliko; Normalno; Malo; Ostalo
sl-SI: Klasifikacija velikosti semen: Zelo majhna (»piščančji jezik«); Velika; Normalna; Majhna; Drugo
th: การจำแนกขนาดเมล็ด: เมล็ดลีบ (เล็กมาก); ใหญ่; ปกติ; เล็ก; อื่นๆ
it: Classificazione della taglia del seme: Lingua di gallina (molto piccolo); Grande; Normale; Piccolo; Altro
vi: Phân loại kích cỡ hạt giống: Lưỡi gà (rất nhỏ); Lớn; Bình thường; Nhỏ; Khác
sv: Klassificering för fröstorlek: Chicken tongue (mycket liten); Stor; Normal; Liten; Övrigt
es: Clasificación del tamaño de la semilla: Lengua de pollo (muy pequeña); Grande; Normal; Pequeña; Otra
hu: Magméret besorolása: Tyúknyelv (nagyon apró); Nagy; Normál; Kicsi; Egyéb
pt-BR: Semente, classificação do tamanho: Língua de frango (muito pequena); Grande; Normal; Pequeno; Outro
da: Størrelsesklassificering for frø: Kyllingetunge (meget lille); Stor; Normal; Lille; Andet
en: Seed size classification: Chicken tongue (very small); Large; Normal; Small; Other
nb: Størrelsesklassifisering for frø: Kyllingtunge (svært liten); Stor; Normal; Liten; Annet
cs: Klasifikace velikosti semen: Kuřecí jazýčky (velmi malé); Velké; Normální; Malé; Jiné
pt-PT: Classificação do tamanho das sementes: Língua de galinha (muito pequena); Grande; Normal; Pequena; Outro
zh-TW: 種子尺寸分類: 雞舌 (極小); 大; 正常; 小; 其他
fr: Classification des graines en fonction de leur taille: Langue de poulet (très petit); Grand; Normal; Petit; Autre
pl: Klasyfikacji wielkości ziaren: Kurzy język (bardzo małe); Duże; Normalne; Małe; Inne